Utah statutes.
54-4-18.   Electric, gas, and water service.
The commission shall have power, after a hearing, to ascertain and fix just
and reasonable standards, classifications, regulations, practices,
measurements or service to be furnished, imposed, observed and followed by all
electrical, gas and water corporations; to ascertain and fix adequate and
serviceable standards for the measurement of quantity, quality, pressure,
initial voltage or other conditions pertaining to the supply of the product,
commodity or service furnished or rendered by any such public utility; to
prescribe reasonable regulations for the examination and testing of such
products, commodity or service, and for the measurement thereof; to establish
reasonable rules, regulations, specifications and standards to secure the
accuracy of all meters and appliances for measurements; and to provide for the
examination and testing of any and all appliances used for the measurement of
any product, commodity or service of any such public utility.
